District of Columbia statutes.
2-1324

Term of office.

Members of the Commission shall serve terms of 3 years except that, of the initial membership, 5 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years, 5 for a term of 2 years, and 5 for 1 year. Members may be reappointed but may serve no more than 2 consecutive terms. A member may continue to serve until a successor is appointed.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 404, 23 DCR 2543
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 5(a), 29 DCR 458
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-171, § 2, 35 DCR 5754

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2324.
1973 Ed., § 6-1924.

Prior Codifications